Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 10
LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIPS;
LIMITED LIABILITY LIMITED PARTNERSHIPS;
FOREIGN LIMITED LIABILITY PARTNERSHIPS;
FOREIGN LIMITED LIABILITY LIMITED PARTNERSHIPS

7-64-1001. Definitions.

As used in this part 10:

"Partner" includes both a general partner and a limited partner.

"Partnership agreement" means the partnership agreement in a partnership or a limited partnership.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 900, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

Cross references:

For additional definitions applicable to this part 10, see § 7-90-102.

7-64-1002. Registration.

A domestic partnership governed by this article may register as a limited liability partnership, and a domestic limited partnership that has made the election provided for in section 7-61-129 or section 7-62-1104 may register as a limited liability limited partnership, by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of registration. If a certificate of limited partnership is being filed, the statement of registration may be included in the certificate of limited partnership.

The statement of registration shall be approved in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or, if not so provided, shall be approved by all of the general partners.

The statement of registration shall state:

The name that has been the true name of the domestic partnership or of the domestic limited partnership and the name that will be the domestic entity name of the domestic limited liability partnership or domestic limited liability limited partnership, which domestic entity name shall comply with part 6 of article 90 of this title;

The principal office address of its principal office; and

The registered agent name and registered agent address of its registered agent.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2004, p. 1452, § 162, effective July 1, 2004.)

Part 8 of article 90 of this title, providing for the transaction of business or the conduct of activities by foreign entities, applies to foreign limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability limited partnerships.

A domestic limited liability partnership or a domestic limited liability limited partnership may cease to be a domestic limited liability partnership or a domestic limited liability limited partnership by delivering to the secretary of state, for filing pursuant to part 3 of article 90 of this title, a statement of withdrawal of registration. The statement of withdrawal of registration shall be approved in the manner provided in the partnership agreement or, if not so provided, shall be approved by all of the general partners. The withdrawal of registration shall be effective upon the effective date of the statement of withdrawal of registration.

A domestic partnership or a domestic limited partnership that has been registered under this part 10 is for all purposes the same entity that existed before it registered. A domestic partnership or a domestic limited partnership that withdraws its registration as a domestic limited liability partnership or a domestic limited liability limited partnership is for all purposes the same entity that existed before it withdrew its registration.

Except as to persons who were partners at the time of filing, the filing of a statement of registration shall be conclusive that all conditions precedent to registration under this section have been met.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 900, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1)(a) and (2)(a) amended, p. 957, § 37, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

IP(1), IP(2), and (4) amended, p. 1827, § 60, effective July 1; IP(1), IP(2), and (4) amended, p. 1691, § 58, effective October 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2255, § 162, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

(1) and (3) amended, p. 1452, § 162, effective July 1.

7-64-1003. Name. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 902, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

7-64-1004. Limitations on distributions to general partner.

A limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership shall not make a distribution to a general partner to the extent that at the time of the distribution, after giving effect to the distribution, all liabilities of the limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership, other than liabilities to general partners on account of their partnership interests and liabilities for which the recourse of creditors is limited to specified property of the partnership, exceed the fair value of the assets of the partnership; except that the fair value of property that is subject to a liability for which the recourse of creditors is limited shall be included in the assets of the partnership only to the extent that the fair value of that property exceeds that liability. For purposes of this section and sections 7-62-607 and 7-62-608, the term "distribution" shall not include payments to the extent that the payments do not exceed amounts equal to or constituting reasonable compensation for present or past services or reasonable payments made in the ordinary course of business pursuant to a bona fide retirement plan or other benefits program.

A general partner in a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (1) of this section, and who knew at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (1) of this section, shall be liable to the partnership for the amount of the distribution. A general partner in a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership who receives a distribution in violation of subsection (1) of this section, and who did not know at the time of the distribution that the distribution violated subsection (1) of this section, shall not be liable for the amount of the distribution. Subject to subsection (3) of this section, this subsection (2) shall not affect any obligation or liability of a general partner under an agreement or other applicable law for the amount of a distribution.

Unless otherwise agreed, a general partner in a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership who receives a distribution from the partnership shall have no liability under this article or other applicable law for the amount of the distribution after the expiration of three years from the date of the distribution unless an action to recover the distribution from such partner is commenced prior to the expiration of the said three-year period and an adjudication of liability against such partner is made in the said action.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 904, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2006:

Entire section amended, p. 851, § 13, effective July 1.

7-64-1005. Liability of general partner upon return of contribution. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 904, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2006:

Entire section repealed, p. 884, § 87, effective July 1.

7-64-1006. Governing law - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 904, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) added by revision, pp. 2356, 2357, §§ 347, 348.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 2356, 2357.)

7-64-1007. Periodic reports.

Part 5 of article 90 of this title, providing for periodic reports from reporting entities, applies to domestic limited liability partnerships and domestic limited liability limited partnerships and applies to foreign limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability limited partnerships that are authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state pursuant to part 8 of article 90 of this title.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 905, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

Entire section repealed, p. 990, § 109, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section RC&RE, p. 2257, § 163, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1453, § 163, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1403), ch. 404, p. 1994, § 7, effective August 11.

7-64-1008. Failure to comply with part 5 of article 90 of this title. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 905, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2000:

(1), (3)(b), and (3)(d) amended, p. 957, § 38, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 2257, § 164, effective July 1, 2004.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 1453, § 164, effective July 1.

L. 2005:

Entire section repealed, p. 1218, § 26, effective October 1.

7-64-1008.5. Registered agent - service of process.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, shall apply to domestic limited liability partnerships and domestic limited liability limited partnerships and to foreign limited liability partnerships and foreign limited liability limited partnerships that are authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state pursuant to part 8 of article 90 of this title.

Source:

L. 2004:

Entire section added, p. 1454, § 165, effective July 1.

7-64-1009. Application of corporation case law to set aside limited liability.

In a case in which a party seeks to hold the general partners of a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership personally responsible for the alleged improper actions of the limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership, the court shall apply the case law that interprets the conditions and circumstances under which the corporate veil of a corporation may be pierced under Colorado law.

For purposes of this section, the failure of a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership to observe the formalities or requirements relating to the management of its business and affairs is not in itself a ground for imposing personal liability on the partners for debts, obligations, or liabilities of the limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 906, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 2258, § 165, effective July 1, 2004.

7-64-1010. Scope of part - choice of law - application to professions and occupations.

A limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership may conduct its business, carry on its operations, and exercise the powers granted by this part 10 within and without the state.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the legal existence of limited liability partnerships and limited liability limited partnerships be recognized outside the boundaries of this state and that the law of this state governing the limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership transacting business outside this state be granted the protection of full faith and credit under section 1 of article IV of the constitution of the United States.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the internal affairs of a limited liability partnership or limited liability limited partnership formed in this state be subject to and governed by the law of this state including the provisions governing liability of general partners for debts, obligations, and liabilities chargeable to partnerships, limited liability partnerships, and limited liability limited partnerships.

Nothing in this part 10 shall be construed to permit a limited liability partnership, foreign limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, or foreign limited liability limited partnership to engage in a profession or occupation as described in title 12, C.R.S., for which there is a specific statutory provision applicable to the practice of such profession or occupation by a corporation or professional corporation in this state unless authorized under applicable provisions of title 12, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire article added, p. 906, § 1, effective January 1, 1998.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 2258, § 166, effective July 1, 2004.